Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1467
Aircraft; operation while under influence of liquor or drug; first offense; penalty.

If a conviction under section 28-1466 is for a first offense, the person shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and the court shall, as part of the judgment of conviction, order such person not to operate any aircraft for any purpose for a period of six months from the date ordered by the court. The order of the court shall be administered upon sentencing, upon final judgment of any appeal or review, or upon the date that any probation is revoked, whichever is later. If the court suspends the proceedings and places such person on probation as provided by law, the court as one of the conditions of probation shall order such person not to operate any aircraft for any purpose for a period of thirty days from the date of the order.

Laws 1978, LB 903, § 3;

Laws 1997, LB 772, § 1.